Washington statutes.
RCW 10.05.080

Evidence, uses and admissibility.

If the petition is not approved or is withdrawn before approval, evidence pertaining to or resulting from the petition and/or investigation is inadmissible in any trial on the charges, but shall be available for use after a conviction in determining a sentence.

[ 1985 c 352 s 11; 1975 1st ex.s. c 244 s 8.]

NOTES:

Legislative finding—Severability—1985 c 352: See notes following RCW 10.05.010.